Missouri, session 2026, HB3450.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.1180, to read as follows:
376.1180. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirement", the same meaning as in section 376.1183;
(2) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as in section 376.1350;
(3) "Health carrier", the same meaning as in section 376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that offers or issues health benefit
plans that are delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage and shall not impose any cost-sharing
requirement for:
(1) Evidence-based items or services that have in effect a rating of A or B in the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task Force with respect to
the individual involved;
(2) Immunizations that have in effect a recommendation from the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention with respect to the individual involved; and
(3) Preventive care and screening provided for in comprehensive guidelines
supported by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3450 2
3. To the extent otherwise permissible under federal or state law, a health carrier
or health benefit plan that uses a network of providers may impose cost-sharing
requirements on the coverage described in subsection 2 of this section for items or
services delivered by an out-of-network provider.
4. If an insured or enrollee is covered under a high deductible health plan, as
such term is defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 223(c)(2), a health carrier or health benefit
plan may apply the deductible requirement of the high deductible health plan to the
coverage required under subsection 2 of this section unless the director of the
department of commerce and insurance determines that the coverage is included in the
safe harbor provisions for preventive care under 26 U.S.C. Section 223(c)(2)(c).
5. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a health
carrier or health benefit plan from providing coverage for services in addition to those
recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task Force or to deny coverage
for services that are not recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task
Force.
6. The director of the department of commerce and insurance shall enforce the
provisions of this section consistent with the recommendations and guidelines in effect
on December 31, 2025, set by the United States Preventive Services Task Force, the
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention, or the federal Health Resources and Services Administration, and related
federal rules or guidance.
7. The director shall, by rule, adopt regulations to require health carriers and
health benefit plans to provide coverage without cost-sharing requirements for any
preventive health care services recommendations and guidelines issued after December
31, 2025, by the United States Preventive Services Task Force, the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or the
federal Health Resources and Services Administration, and related federal rules or
guidance.
8. (1) The department of commerce and insurance shall create an advisory
committee to be known as the "Health Insurance Preventive Health Care Services
Advisory Committee". This committee shall be composed of five members, with three
representatives of health care providers and two representatives of health carriers and
health benefit plans. All members of the committee shall be appointed by, and serve at
the pleasure of, the director of the department. The committee members shall serve
without compensation and shall not be reimbursed for their expenses.
(2) The committee shall meet at least once each year to make recommendations
to the department, the general assembly, and the governor regarding any updates or

HB 3450 3
modifications, as necessary, to the preventive health care services described in
subsection 2 of this section. The committee shall provide any recommendations for
updates or modifications no later than November first each year to the department, the
general assembly, and the governor.
9. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔